Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EVICTION MORATORIUM
SECTION 1.  Section 3, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2020  (first special session), as amended by
section 8, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) As used in this section and in section 7 , chapter 3, Oregon  Laws 2020 (third spe-
cial session) [ of this 2020 third special session Act ]:
(a) “Emergency period” means the period beginning on April 1, 2020, and ending  on [ December
31, 2020, except as the period may be extended through ] June 30, 2021[ , under section  7 (1) of this 2020
third special session Act ].
(b) “End of the grace period” means [ March 31, 2021, unless the period is extended through June
30, 2021, under section 7 (1) of this 2020 third special session Act ] February 28, 2022 .
(c) “Nonpayment” means the nonpayment of a payment that becomes due  during the emergency
period to a landlord,  including a payment of rent, late charges, utility or service charges or any
other charge or fee as described in the rental agreement or ORS 90.140, 90.302, 90.315, 90.392, 90.394,
90.560 to 90.584 or 90.630.
(d) “Nonpayment balance” includes all or a part of the net total amount of all items  of non-
payment by a tenant during the emergency period.
(e) “Termination notice without  cause” means a notice delivered by a landlord under ORS 90.427
(3)(b), (4)(b) or (c), or (8)(a)(B) or (b)(B).
(2) Before the end of the grace period, notwithstanding this  chapter or ORS 105.105 to 105.168,
a landlord may not, and may not threaten to:
(a) Deliver a notice of termination of  a rental agreement based on a tenant’s nonpayment bal-
ance;
(b) Initiate or continue  an action under ORS 105.110 to take possession of a dwelling unit based
on a notice of termination for nonpayment delivered during the emergency period;
(c) Take any action that would interfere with a  tenant’s possession or use of a dwelling unit
based on a tenant’s nonpayment balance;
Enrolled Senate Bill 282 (SB 282-A) Page 1
(d) Assess a late fee or any other penalty on a tenant’s nonpayment;  or
[(e) Report a tenant’s nonpayment  balance as delinquent to any consumer credit reporting agency;
or]
[(f)] (e) File an action to recover the nonpayment balance.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 90.220 (9),  before applying payments received from a tenant or on be-
half of a tenant  to a tenant’s nonpayment balance, a landlord shall first apply the payments, in the
following order, to:
(a) Rent for the current rental period;
(b) Utility or service charges;
(c) Late rent payment charges; and
(d) Fees or  charges owed by the tenant under ORS 90.302 or other fees or charges related to
damage claims or other claims against the tenant.
[(4)(a) Before June 30, 2021, a landlord  may not deliver a termination notice without cause and
may not file an action under ORS 105.110 based on a termination notice without cause. ]
[(b)] (4) If the first year of occupancy would end after April 1, 2020, and before August 31, 2021,
for the purposes of a termination notice without cause,  the “first year of occupancy” is extended to
mean a period lasting until August 31, 2021.
(5)(a) A landlord may deliver a written notice to a tenant before  the end of the grace period
stating that the tenant continues  to owe any rent [ due.] that accrued from April 1, 2020, through
June 30, 2021, but
[(b) If the emergency period is extended under section 7 (1) of this 2020 third  special session
Act,] the notice must also  include a statement that eviction for nonpayment of rent, charges and fees
accrued from April 1, 2020, to  June 30, 2021, is not  allowed before [ June 30, 2021 ] February 28,
2022.
[(c) If the emergency period is not extended  under section 7 (1) of this 2020 third special session
Act, the notice must also include: ]
[(A) A statement that eviction for nonpayment of rent, charges and  fees accrued from April 1, 2020,
to December 31, 2020, is not allowed before March 31, 2021; and ]
[(B) A  copy of both the notice and declaration form described in section 7 (3) of this 2020 third
special session Act. ]
[(d)] (b)  The notice may also include information regarding  tenant resources and may offer a
voluntary payment plan for the nonpayment balance. If the notice  offers a voluntary payment plan,
the notice must  state that the payment plan is voluntary. The notice may include a request that the
tenant contact the landlord to discuss the voluntary payment plan.
(6)(a) If a tenancy terminates before the end of the grace  period, a landlord may claim from the
security deposit or last month’s rent deposit to repay the unpaid rent balance that accrued  during
the emergency period under ORS 90.300 (7) or (9).
(b) Prior to the end of the grace period, a tenant  with an unpaid rent balance that accrued
during the emergency period is not considered to be in default in rent under  ORS 90.385 (4)(c) or
90.390 (2).
(c) A landlord’s acceptance of a partial payment  of rent before the end of the grace period does
not constitute a waiver of a landlord’s right to terminate the tenancy for:
(A) A violation of the rental agreement, notwithstanding ORS 90.412 (2); or
(B) Nonpayment of the rent balance owed under ORS 90.394 after the end of the grace period,
notwithstanding ORS 90.417 (4).
(7) A termination notice given under ORS 90.394 must substantially state that:
(a) Eviction for nonpayment of rent, charges and fees that accrued on and after April 1,
2020, and before June 30, 2021, is not allowed before February 28, 2022; and
(b) Information regarding tenant resources is available at www.211info.org.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to section 3, chapter 13, Oregon Laws  2020 (first special
session), by section 1 of this 2021 Act become operative on July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 282 (SB 282-A) Page 2
SECTION 3.  Section 4, chapter 13, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special session), as amended by
section 24, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Section 3, chapter 13, Oregon Laws  2020 (first special session), as amended by section
8 [of this 2020 third special session Act ], chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), and
section 1 of this 2021 Act , is repealed on [ September 1, 2021 ] March 1, 2022 .
SECTION 4.  Section 22, chapter 3,  Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 22. (1) The amendments to ORS [ 90.385, 90.394,] 105.113 [ and 105.124 by sections 18 to 21
of this 2020 third  special session Act ] by section 20, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special
session), become operative on July 1, 2021.
(2) The  amendments to ORS 90.385, 90.394 and 105.124 by sections 18, 19 and 21, chapter
3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), become operative on March 1, 2022.
SECTION 5.  Section 7, chapter 13, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special session), as amended by
section 17, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Notwithstanding ORS 12.125, the period of limitation is tolled until [ July 1, 2021] March
1, 2022, for claims by a landlord based on a tenant’s  nonpayment or nonpayment balance, both as
defined in section 3, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
TENANT REPORTING AND SCREENING
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 7. A landlord may not report to any consumer  credit reporting agency a
tenant’s nonpayment of rent, charges  or fees that accrued on or after April 1, 2020, and be-
fore July 1, 2021.
SECTION 8.  ORS 90.303 is amended to read:
90.303. (1) When evaluating an applicant,  a landlord may not consider an action to recover
possession pursuant to ORS 105.105 to 105.168 if the action:
(a) Was dismissed or resulted in a general  judgment for the applicant before the applicant sub-
mits the application.
(b) Resulted in a general judgment against the applicant that was :
(A) Entered five or more years before the applicant submits the application[ .]; or
(B) Entered on claims that arose on or after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022.
(2) When evaluating the applicant, a landlord may not  consider a previous arrest of the appli-
cant if the arrest did not result in a  conviction. This subsection does not apply if the arrest has
resulted in  charges for criminal behavior as described in subsection (3) of this section that have not
been dismissed at the time the applicant submits the application.
(3) When evaluating the applicant, the landlord may not  consider criminal conviction and
charging history unless the conviction or pending charge is for conduct that is:
(a) A drug-related  crime, but not including convictions based solely on the use or possession of
marijuana;
(b) A person crime;
(c) A sex offense;
(d) A crime involving financial fraud, including identity theft and forgery; or
(e) Any  other crime if the conduct for which the applicant was convicted or charged is of a
nature that would adversely affect:
(A) Property of the landlord or a tenant; or
(B) The health, safety or right to peaceful enjoyment of the premises  of residents, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent.
(4) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not consider the possession  of a medical
marijuana card or status as a medical marijuana patient.
Enrolled Senate Bill 282 (SB 282-A) Page 3
(5) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may  not consider an applicant’s unpaid rent,
including rent reflected in judgments or referrals of  debt to a collection agency, that accrued
on or after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022.
SECTION 9.  ORS 105.163 is amended to read:
105.163. (1) A person who was a defendant in an action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168 may apply
by motion  to the court where the judgment was entered for an order setting aside the judgment and
sealing the official records of the action pertaining to the applicant. The  court shall grant the mo-
tion if the court finds that:
(a) The judgment  was a judgment of restitution entered against the applicant, [ a period of at
least five years has passed  from the date of entry of the judgment and ] the applicant has satisfied any
money award included in the judgment[ ;] and:
(A) At least five years have passed from the date of the judgment; or
(B) The judgment was based on claims that  arose on or after April 1, 2020, and before
March 1, 2022;
(b) The judgment was a judgment by stipulation of the parties under ORS 105.145 (2)  and the
applicant has complied with the terms of the stipulated  agreement and satisfied any money award
included in the judgment; or
(c) The judgment was a judgment or judgment of dismissal entered in the applicant’s favor.
(2) The applicant shall serve a copy of the motion filed under subsection (1) of this section upon
the person who was the  plaintiff in the action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168. Within 30 days of
service of the motion, if a written objection is filed, the court shall schedule a hearing.
(3) If, under subsection (2) of this section, no objection is  filed or after a hearing the court de-
termines that the applicant is eligible for relief under subsection (1) of  this section, the court shall
enter an appropriate order setting  aside the judgment and sealing the official records of the action
pertaining to the applicant. Upon entry of the order, the judgment that is the  subject of the motion
shall be deemed not to have been entered, and the applicant may  answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(4) The court may not charge a filing fee for the  filing of a motion under subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 90.303, as amended by section 8 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
90.303. (1) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not  consider an action to recover
possession pursuant to ORS 105.105 to 105.168 if the action:
(a) Was dismissed or resulted in a general judgment  for the applicant before the applicant sub-
mits the application.
(b) Resulted in a general judgment against the applicant that was[ :]
[(A)] entered five or more years before the applicant submits the application[ ; or ].
[(B) Entered on claims that arose after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022. ]
(2) When evaluating the applicant, a landlord may  not consider a previous arrest of the appli-
cant if the arrest did not result in a conviction. This  subsection does not apply if the arrest has
resulted in  charges for criminal behavior as described in subsection (4) of this section that have not
been dismissed at the time the applicant submits the application.
(3) When evaluating the applicant,  the landlord may not consider criminal conviction and
charging history unless the conviction or pending charge is for conduct that is:
(a) A drug-related crime, but not including convictions based solely on the use or  possession of
marijuana;
(b) A person crime;
(c) A sex offense;
(d) A crime involving financial fraud, including identity theft and forgery; or
(e) Any other crime if the conduct for which the applicant was convicted or charged is of  a
nature that would adversely affect:
(A) Property of the landlord or a tenant; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 282 (SB 282-A) Page 4
(B) The health, safety or  right to peaceful enjoyment of the premises of residents, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent.
(4) When evaluating an  applicant, a landlord may not consider the possession of a medical
marijuana card or status as a medical marijuana patient.
[(5) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not consider  an applicant’s unpaid rent, in-
cluding rent reflected in judgments or referrals of debt to a collection agency, that accrued on or  after
April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022. ]
SECTION 11.  ORS 105.163, as amended by section 9 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
105.163. (1) A person who was a defendant in an action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168 may apply
by motion  to the court where the judgment was entered for an order setting aside the judgment and
sealing the official records of the action pertaining to the applicant. The  court shall grant the mo-
tion if the court finds that:
(a) The judgment was a judgment of restitution entered against the  applicant, the applicant has
satisfied any money award included in the judgment and[ :]
[(A)] at least five years have passed from the date of the judgment; [ or]
[(B) Judgments based on claims that arose on or after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022; ]
(b) The judgment was a judgment by stipulation of the parties under ORS 105.145 (2)  and the
applicant has complied with the terms of the stipulated  agreement and satisfied any money award
included in the judgment; or
(c) The judgment was a judgment or judgment of dismissal entered in the applicant’s favor.
(2) The applicant shall serve a copy of the motion filed under subsection (1) of this section upon
the person who was the  plaintiff in the action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168. Within 30 days of
service of the motion, if a written objection is filed, the court shall schedule a hearing.
(3) If, under subsection (2) of this section, no objection is  filed or after a hearing the court de-
termines that the applicant is eligible for relief under subsection (1) of  this section, the court shall
enter an appropriate order setting  aside the judgment and sealing the official records of the action
pertaining to the applicant. Upon entry of the order, the judgment that is the  subject of the motion
shall be deemed not to have been entered, and the applicant may  answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(4) The court may not charge a filing fee for the  filing of a motion under subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 12.
The amendments to ORS 90.303 and 105.163 by sections 10 and 11 of  this
2021 Act become operative on January 2, 2028.
NONTENANT GUESTS
SECTION 13. Section 14 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 14. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 90.262 (3) or 90.510 (7), a landlord may not enforce
a restriction by any  means including assessing a fee or terminating the tenancy, if the re-
striction is based on:
(a) A maximum occupancy guideline for the number of tenants or guests lower than  an
amount required by federal, state or local law or regulation.
(b) The maximum duration of a guest’s stay in the tenancy.
(2) If a tenant’s guest resides  in the dwelling unit more than 15 days in any 12-month
period, a landlord may require that:
(a) The tenant’s guest satisfy the screening or admissions criteria ordinarily  considered
by the landlord for tenants, except  that the landlord may not use criteria related to credit
reports, credit references or income; and
(b) The tenant  and the guest enter into a temporary occupancy agreement as provided
in ORS 90.275, except that the landlord  may not require that the agreement have an ending
date earlier than February 28, 2022.
Enrolled Senate Bill 282 (SB 282-A) Page 5
(3) This section does not prohibit a landlord from assessing a fee allowed by ORS 90.302
or terminating a tenancy based upon the conduct of a tenant’s guest or based on the tenant’s
guest’s failure to comply with subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 90.403 or 90.412, acceptance of  a payment by a landlord from the
tenant or guest does not make the guest a tenant under this chapter.
(5) As used in this section, “guest” means an individual  who is staying temporarily, in-
cluding overnight, within the dwelling unit at the invitation of the tenant.
SECTION 15. Section 14 of this 2021 Act is repealed on March 1, 2022.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 16. The unit captions  used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 17. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 14, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 11, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 282 (SB 282-A) Page 6